Maryland, session 2026, HB1263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Workgroup on Postoperative Cosmetic Care to study the regulation
of postoperative cosmetic and body–altering services provided by nonphysician
practitioners with a focus on patient safety, consumer protection, and continuity of care.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) the Secretary of Labor, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) the President of the State Board of Nursing, or the President’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1263*

HOUSE BILL 1263
(4) the Chair of the State Board of Massage Therapy Examiners, or the
Chair’s designee;
(5) the Chair of the State Board of Physical Therapy Examiners, or the
Chair’s designee; and
(6) the following members, appointed by the Secretary of Health:
(i) one licensed physician specializing in cosmetic or plastic surgery;
(ii) one licensed acupuncturist;
(iii) one consumer or patient advocate with experience in
postsurgical care;
(iii) (iv) one representative of a postoperative care or recovery
services organization; and
(iv) (v) any additional stakeholders determined appropriate by
the Secretary of Health.
(c) The members of the Workgroup shall elect the chair of the Workgroup from
among its members.
(d) Members of the Workgroup representing government entities shall designate
staff from their respective government entities to staff the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) examine how postoperative cosmetic care is currently regulated or
overseen in the State;
(2) identify any gaps in patient access to qualified providers of cosmetic
care;
(3) review conflicts between existing scope–of–practice laws;
(4) evaluate risks posed by unrecognized or unregulated practitioners that
provide cosmetic care services;

HOUSE BILL 1263 3
(5) assess training and education requirements for postoperative cosmetic
care;
(6) review best practices and regulatory models from other states;
(7) consider options for certification, registration, or professional
recognition for providers of postsurgical cosmetic care, including alignment with existing
licensing boards;
(8) make recommendations that prioritize consumer protection and patient
safety;
(9) avoid recommending the creation of a new licensure program unless
necessary; and
(10) consider low–cost and nonbureaucratic options.
(g) In carrying out its duties under subsection (f) of this section, the Workgroup
shall focus on consumer protection, patient safety, and continuity of care over industry
expansion.
(h) (1) On or before December 1, 2026, the Workgroup shall submit an interim
report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the
House of Delegates.
(2) On or before December 1, 2027, the Workgroup shall submit a final
report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the
House of Delegates.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Workgroup on
Postoperative Cosmetic Care is not a regulatory board and may not establish a licensure
program without legislative approval.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2028,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.